Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-174
Richardson.

The county of Richardson is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township one, north, of range thirteen, east; thence east to the middle of the main channel of the Missouri River; thence up said channel until it intersects the line dividing townships three and four, north; thence west to the northwest corner of township three, north, of range thirteen, east; and thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 44, p. 220;

R.S.1913, § 889;

C.S.1922, § 791;

C.S.1929, § 25-178;

R.S.1943, § 22-174;

Laws 1998, LB 59, § 2.